GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-rivers.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     river names
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	14-May-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# [E] http:publications.europa.eu/code/it/it-5000500.htm
!# [W] Wikipedia
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols

+Prop +Adj +NAdj

+River


+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space


LEXICON ROOT 

!# rivers

Adda+Prop+River 	MSG;
Adige+Prop+River	MSG;
Arno+Prop+River 	MSG;
Dora+Prop+River		FSG;
Tevere+Prop+River 	MSG;
Po+Prop+River		MSG;
Oglio+Prop+River 	MSG;
Tanaro+Prop+River 	MSG;
Ticino+Prop+River 	MSG;
Piave+Prop+River	MSG;
Reno+Prop+River 	MSG;
Sarca-Mincio+Prop+River MSG;
Volturno+Prop+River 	MSG;
Brenta+Prop+River 	MSG;
Secchia+Prop+River 	MSG;
Tagliamento+Prop+River 	MSG;
Ofanto+Prop+River 	MSG;
Ombrone+Prop+River 	MSG;
Chiese+Prop+River 	MSG;
Liri-Garigliano+Prop+River	MSG;
Bormida+Prop+River 	MSG;
Tirso+Prop+River 	MSG;
Basento+Prop+River 	MSG;
Panaro+Prop+River 	MSG;
Aterno+Prop+River 	MSG;
Salso+Prop+River 	MSG;
Agogna+Prop+River 	MSG;
Sesia+Prop+River 	MFSG;
Agri+Prop+River 	MSG;
Olona+Prop+River 	MSG;
Lambro+Prop+River 	MSG;
Flumendosa+Prop+River 	MSG;
Savio+Prop+River 	MSG;
Taro+Prop+River 	MSG;
Serio+Prop+River 	MSG;
Sangro+Prop+River 	MSG;
Metauro+Prop+River 	MSG;
Bradano+Prop+River 	MSG;
Bacchiglione+Prop+River MSG;
Nera+Prop+River 	MSG;
Tronto+Prop+River 	MSG;
Trebbia+Prop+River 	MSG;
Simeto+Prop+River 	MSG;
Livenza+Prop+River 	MSG;
Serchio+Prop+River 	MSG;
Fortore+Prop+River 	MSG;
Belice+Prop+River 	MSG;
Cervaro+Prop+River 	MSG;
Noce+Prop+River 	MSG;
Platani+Prop+River 	MSG;
Orco+Prop+River 	MSG;


Calore% Irpino+Prop+River	MSG;
Dora% Baltea+Prop+River		FSG;
Rio% Mannu-Coghinas+Prop+River	MSG;
Dora% Riparia+Prop+River	FSG;
Imera% Meridionale+Prop+River	MSG;
Stura% di% Demonte+Prop+River	MSG;



!# more  rivers (World)

Nilo+Prop+River 			MSG; 			!# 6671  	Africa 
Rio% delle% Amazzoni+Prop+River  	MSG;	 		!# 6280 	America del Sud 
Mississipi+Prop+River			MSG;			!#  	America del Sud 
Missouri+Prop+River			MSG;			!#  	America del Sud 
Red% Rock+Prop+River 	 		MSG;		 	!# 5970 	America del Nord 
Chang% Jiang+Prop+River  		MSG;			!# (Fiume Azzurro) 	5800 	Asia 
Fiume% Azzurro+Prop+River	  	MSG;			!# (Chang Jiang) 	5800 	Asia 
Ob+Prop+River  		 		MSG;			!# (with Irtys) 		5410 	Asia 
Huang% He+Prop+River 	 		MSG;			!# (Fiume Giallo) 	4845 	Asia
Fiume% Giallo+Prop+River  		MSG;			!# (Huang He) 		4845 	Asia
Rio% Paraná+Prop+River   		MSG;			!# 4700 	America del Sud 
Mekong+Prop+River  	 		MSG;			!# 4500 	Asia 
Amur+Prop+River  	 		MSG;			!# (con Silka) 		4416 	Asia 
Lena+Prop+River  	 		MSG;			!# 4400 	Asia 
Congo+Prop+River  	 		MSG;			!# (Zaire) 	4374 	Africa  --  these names will give some problems (countries)
Irtys+Prop+River  	 		MSG;			!# 4248 	Asia 
Mackenzie+Prop+River  	 		MSG;			!# (with Peace River) 	4241 	America del Nord 
Niger+Prop+River  	 		MSG;			!# 4184 	Africa 
Jenisej+Prop+River  	 		MSG;			!# 4092 	Asia 
Volga+Prop+River 	 		MSG;		 	!# 3531 	Europa Russia, Kazakistan 
Madeira+Prop+River  	 		MSG;			!# (con Mamoré) 	3240 	America del Sud 
Purus+Prop+River			MSG;			!#3210 	America del Sud 
Yukon+Prop+River			MSG;			!#3185 	America del Nord 
Indo+Prop+River				MSG;			!#3180 	Asia 
Rio% Grande+Prop+River			MSG; 			!# 3060 	America del Nord 
San% Lorenzo+Prop+River			MSG;			!# 3058 	America del Nord 
Brahmaputra+Prop+River  		MSG;			!# 2900 	Asia 
Rio% São% Francisco+Prop+River		MSG;			!# 2900 	America del Sud 
Rio% San% Francisco+Prop+River		MSG;			!# 2900 	America del Sud 
Rio% Sao% Francisco+Prop+River		MSG;			!# 2900 	America del Sud 
Danubio+Prop+River			MSG;			!# 2858 	Europa Germania, Austria, Slovacchia, Ungheria, Croazia, Serbia, Romania, Bulgaria, Ucraina 
Eufrate+Prop+River		  	MSG;			!# 2760 	Asia 
Darling+Prop+River			MSG;			!# (con Culgoa e Condamine) 	2740 	Oceania 
Zambesi+Prop+River  			MSG;			!# 2736 	Africa 
Rio% Tocantins+Prop+River  		MSG;			!# 2700 	America del Sud 
Syrdarja+Prop+River 		 	MSG; 			!# 2671 	Asia 
Vilyuy+Prop+River			MSG;			!#2650 	Asia 
Araguaia+Prop+River			MSG;			!# 2600 	America del Sud 
Nelson+Prop+River			MSG;			!#(with Saskatchewan) 	2575 	America del Nord 
Tunguska% Inferiore+Prop+River   	MSG; 			!# 2550 	Asia 
Amudarja+Prop+River			MSG;			!# 2540 	Asia 
Murray+Prop+River			MSG;			!#2520 	Oceania 
Gange+Prop+River			MSG;			!#2510 	Asia 
Rio% Pilcomayo+Prop+River    		MSG;			!# 2500 	America del Sud


Ural+Prop+River				MSG;			!#2428 	Russia, Kazakistan 
Dnepr+Prop+River			MSG;			!#2201 	Russia, Bielorussia, Ucraina 
Don+Prop+River 		 		MSG;		 	!# 1870 	Russia 
Pecora+Prop+River			MSG;			!#1809 	Russia 
Kama+Prop+River				MSG;			!#1805 	Russia 
Oka+Prop+River				MSG;			!#1480 	Russia 
Belaja+Prop+River			MSG;			!#1430 	Russia 
Dnestr+Prop+River			MSG;			!#1370 	Ucraina, Moldavia 
Reno+Prop+River				MSG;			!#1320 	Svizzera, Liechtenstein, Austria, Germania, Francia, Paesi Bassi 
Vjatka+Prop+River			MSG;			!#1314 	Russia 
Dvina% Settentrionale+Prop+River	MSG;			!# 1302 	Russia 
Elba+Prop+River				MSG;			!# 1165 	Rep. Ceca, Germania 
Desna+Prop+River			MSG;		 	!# 1130 	Russia, Ucraina 
Vycegda+Prop+River			MSG;			!# 1130 	Russia 
Donec+Prop+River			MSG;			!# 1053 	Russia, Ucraina 
Vistola+Prop+River			MSG;			!# 1047 	Polonia 
Dvina% Occidentale+Prop+River		MSG;			!# 1020 	Russia, Bielorussia, Lettonia 
Loira+Prop+River			MSG;		 	!# 1020 	Francia 
Tago+Prop+River				MSG;		 	!# 1007 	Spagna, Portogallo 


!# rivers



Amù-Darjà+Prop+River		MSG;
Aniene+Prop+River		MSG;
Arno+Prop+River			MSG;
Brenta+Prop+River		MSG;
Crati+Prop+River		MSG;
Dniepr+Prop+River		MSG;
Dniestr+Prop+River		MSG;
Don+Prop+River			MSG;
Dora% Baltea+Prop+River		FSG;
Dora+Prop+River			FSG;
Dora% Riparia+Prop+River	FSG;
Drava+Prop+River		FSG;
Duero+Prop+River		MSG;
Ebro+Prop+River			MSG;
Flumendosa+Prop+River		MSG;
Fortore+Prop+River		MSG;
Gambia+Prop+River		MSG;
Garigliano+Prop+River		MSG;
Garonna+Prop+River		FSG;
Giordano+Prop+River		MSG;
Guadalquivir+Prop+River		MSG;
Hudson+Prop+River		MSG;
Ienissei+Prop+River		MSG;
Irrawadi+Prop+River		MSG;
Isonzo+Prop+River		MSG;
Lete+Prop+River			MSG;
Loira+Prop+River		FSG;
Meno+Prop+River			MSG;
Metauro+Prop+River		MSG;
Mississippi+Prop+River		MSG;
Moldava+Prop+River		FSG;
Mosa+Prop+River			FSG;
Mosella+Prop+River		FSG;
Neckar+Prop+River		MSG;
Oder+Prop+River			MSG;
Ofanto+Prop+River		MSG;
Orinoco+Prop+River		MSG;
Panaro+Prop+River		MSG;
Paraguay+Prop+River		MSG;
Paraná-Paraguay+Prop+River	MSG;
Paraná+Prop+River		MSG;
Pescara+Prop+River		MSG;
Piave+Prop+River		MSG;
Po+Prop+River			MSG;
Reno+Prop+River			MSG;
Rodano+Prop+River		MSG;
Saluen+Prop+River		MSG;
Schelda+Prop+River		FSG;
Secchia+Prop+River		MSG;
Senna+Prop+River		FSG;
Serchio+Prop+River		MSG;
Si-kiang+Prop+River		MSG;
Simeto+Prop+River		MSG;
Sir-Darjà+Prop+River		MSG;
Tagliamento+Prop+River		MSG;
Tago+Prop+River			MSG;
Tamigi+Prop+River		MSG;
Tanaro+Prop+River		MSG;
Tevere+Prop+River		MSG;
Ticino+Prop+River		MSG;
Toce+Prop+River			MSG;
Tronto+Prop+River		MSG;
Vistola+Prop+River		FSG;
Volturno+Prop+River		MSG;
Weiss+Prop+River		MSG;
Yang-tze-kiang+Prop+River	MSG;




!# continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MFSG	+MF+Sg		#;
